Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,124
Health maintenance organization; deemed to transact business of insurance.

Notwithstanding any differences provided by law between a health maintenance organization and an insurer as described in section 44-103, a health maintenance organization shall be deemed to assume, underwrite, and spread risk and otherwise transact the business of insurance.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 33.